District of Columbia statutes.
36-123

Defacing or destroying registered containers.

Whoever shall by himself or his agent willfully deface, erase, alter, obliterate, cover up, or otherwise remove or conceal any registered name, mark, or device registered by another and being on any milk bottle, can, crate, or other container, or shall willfully break, destroy, or otherwise injure any registered milk bottle, can, crate, or other container which has been registered by another shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in this subchapter.

History

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 810, ch. 737, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-203.
1973 Ed., § 48-203.